New York, session 2025-2026, S3467.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 48 of the executive law, as 2 amended by chapter 754 of the laws of 1977, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 5. [On the initiative of the office and at] At the direction of the 5 welfare inspector general, to conduct any investigation: of the oper- 6 ations of the state social services department and local social services 7 districts, the state health department and local health departments, and 8 the state department of mental hygiene and community mental health 9 boards in order to insure proper expenditure of welfare funds; of 10 violations of the welfare system; of failure to prosecute welfare 11 frauds; of failure to enforce the state's laws regarding the employment 12 of welfare recipients in available employment; of failure of local offi- 13 cials and employees to comply with state law, rules, and regulations 14 regarding welfare administration which shall be deemed to include 15 medical assistance, and other matters relating thereto. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07342-01-5